District of Columbia statutes.
47-2019

Determination of deficiencies.

If a return required by this chapter is not filed, or if a return when filed is incorrect or insufficient, the amount of tax due shall be determined by the Mayor from such information as may be obtainable. Assessments of any deficiencies in the tax due under this chapter, or any interest and penalties thereon, shall be governed by § 47-4312.

History

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 119, ch. 146, title I, § 139
July 24, 1982, D.C. Law 4-131, § 223, 29 DCR 2418
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-217, § 4(c), 51 DCR 9126

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-2007, § 47-2021, and § 47-2213.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2019.
1973 Ed., § 47-2616.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-217 rewrote the section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(c) of Office of Administrative Hearings Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-513, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8976).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(c) of Office of Administrative Hearings Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-553, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10359).